apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="/àere__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>àere</l>      <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aer</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>aende</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aende</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aendi</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aendi</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>apo</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ada</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>adi</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ana</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>aia</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aias</l>      <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>aiada</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aiad</l>      <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iat</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ari</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>aiat</l>      <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aìamus</l>    <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aiamus</l>    <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>aiais</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aiant</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aian</l>      <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>apa</l>       <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>apas</l>      <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>apat</l>      <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>apamus</l>    <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>apais</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>apant</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aere</l>      <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aeres</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aeret</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aeremus</l>   <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aereis</l>    <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aerent</l>    <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>àpidu</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>àpida</l>     <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>àpidos</l>    <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>àpidas</l>    <r>àere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="bisogni/are__vblex" c="">
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aiat</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aiant</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aret</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arent</l>     <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>adu</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ada</l>       <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ados</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adas</l>      <r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="àere">            <i></i><par n="/àere__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bisogniare">      <i>bisogni</i><par n="bisogni/are__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="bisogniare"><p><l>bisonz</l>   <r>bisogni</r></p><par n="bisogni/are__vblex"/></e>
